Idaho, session 2025, S1185.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Judicial Branch the following amounts to
be expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from
the General Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
Supreme Court $218,000 $218,000
Court of Appeals 113,700 113,700
District Courts 2,247,100 $29,500 $14,000 2,290,600
Magistrate Division 2,538,600 22,400 7,000 2,568,000
TOTAL $5,117,400 $51,900 $21,000 $5,190,300
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.